Georgia, session 2025_26, HB921.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Education Impact Transparency Act."
SECTION 2.
Article 1 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
State Board of Education, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
H. B. 921
- 1 -

LC 61 0253
"20-2-21.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Department' means the Georgia Department of Education.
(2) 'Local education agency' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
Section 20-2-167.1.
(3) 'Study' or 'impact study' means the impact study provided for in this Code section.
(b) The department shall complete an impact study within 90 days of any action by any
branch of the federal government that results in a reduction of more than 20 percent in the
scope, workforce, or budget of the United States Department of Education; provided,
however, that, if such federal action occurs prior to the effective date of this Act, such
study shall be completed within 90 days of the effective date of this Act. Such study shall
assess the impact of such federal action on public primary and secondary education in this
state and shall include, but shall not be limited to, the potential effects of such federal
action on:
(1) Each local education agency and each public primary and secondary school in this
state, including, but not limited to, effects related to funding, staffing, resources, and
school operations; and
(2) Students, including, but not limited to, academic performance and access to
programs.
(c) The department shall be authorized to contract with a nonpartisan independent entity
with expertise in education policy and finance to conduct the study.
(d) The department shall prepare a report on the findings of the study, which shall be
provided to each local education agency and shall be made available on the department's
website in a format that is accessible and understandable by the public."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 921
- 2 -